Washington statutes.
RCW 4.08.060

Guardian ad litem for incapacitated person.

When an incapacitated person is a party to an action in the superior courts he or she shall appear by guardian, or if he or she has no guardian, or in the opinion of the court the guardian is an improper person, the court shall appoint one to act as guardian ad litem. Said guardian shall be appointed as follows:

(1) When the incapacitated person is plaintiff, upon the application of a relative or friend of the incapacitated person.

(2) When the incapacitated person is defendant, upon the application of a relative or friend of such incapacitated person, such application shall be made within thirty days after the service of summons if served in the state of Washington, and if served out of the state or service is made by publication, then such application shall be made within sixty days after the first publication of summons or within sixty days after the service out of the state. If no such application be made within the time above limited, application may be made by any party to the action.

[ 1996 c 249 s 5; 1899 c 91 s 1; RRS s 188.]

NOTES:

Intent—1996 c 249: See note following RCW 2.56.030.